District of Columbia statutes.
5-116.31

Body-Worn Camera Program; generally.

The Body-Worn Camera Program in the Metropolitan Police Department in Fiscal Year 2016 shall not be implemented until certification by the Chief Financial Officer that the cost of public access to body-worn camera recordings, if any, is funded in the Fiscal Year 2016 budget and 4-year financial plan.

History

Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 3002, 62 DCR 10905

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 3002 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).